Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2929
Physical therapy aide; authorized activities.

A physical therapy aide may perform treatment-related and non-treatment-related tasks under the supervision of a physical therapist or a physical therapist assistant.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 143;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1,387;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1022.